Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1907
Polygraph, defined.

Polygraph shall mean any mechanical or electronic instrument which uses attached sensors to record psychophysiological responses for the purpose of attempting to determine truth or deception and which records permanently and simultaneously at least three physiological responses. The physiological responses recorded shall include, but not be limited to, respiratory pattern, cardiovascular pattern, and galvanic skin response.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 7.